Louisiana, session 2026, SB437.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2852(C)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
40:2852(C)(3) through (5) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2852. Facilities providing housing or temporary residence to individuals referred
by judicial agencies
* * *
C. * * *
(2) No facility shall provide treatment to any individual and no judicial
agency shall refer any individual to a facility providing treatment until the Louisiana
Department of Health has adopted rules and has inspected the facility and certified
that the facility is in compliance with these rules as provided for by this Section
provided for in Subsection A of this Section shall provide residential substance
use disorder treatment to any individual, unless the facility is licensed by the
Louisiana Department of Health pursuant to R.S. 40:2151 et seq., as a
behavioral health service provider with the residential substance use disorder
treatment module.
(3) No judicial agency shall refer any individual to a facility providing
residential substance use disorder treatment until that facility has been
surveyed and licensed by the Louisiana Department of Health as a behavioral
health service provider with the residential substance use disorder treatment
module pursuant to R.S. 40:2151 et seq.
(4) A complaint regarding a residential facility providing residential
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 437 ENROLLED
substance use disorder treatment without a license may be filed with the
licensing section of the Louisiana Department of Health for investigation.
(5) Nothing herein shall prohibit a licensed physician or a licensed
mental health professional or licensed behavioral health service provider as
defined in R.S. 40:2153 from providing behavioral health or substance use
disorder treatment services, including substance use disorder counseling
services, to persons in their place of residence.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.